Washington statutes.
RCW 21.20.470

Compensation, travel expenses of administrator and employees.

The administrator, and any person employed by the administrator, shall be paid, in addition to regular compensation, travel expenses incurred by each of them in the performance of their duties under this chapter in accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060 as now existing or hereafter amended.

[ 1979 ex.s. c 68 s 34; 1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 34 s 64; 1959 c 282 s 47.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Severability—1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 34: See notes following RCW 2.08.115.